Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 39.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-170
Audit, report, or financial statement;
public agency of state; made by whom.

Whenever any statute
or rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by authority of any statute
requires that any audit, report, financial statement, or other document for
any department, division, board, commission, agency, or officer of this state
be prepared by certified public accountants, such requirement, except as provided
in section 1-171, shall be construed to mean certified public accountants holding
a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136 or
a person exercising the practice privilege or temporary practice privilege.

Laws 1965, c. 1, § 1, p. 59;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 62;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 39.